Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB381.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 186.162 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section and in KRS 186.043, 186.164, 186.166, 186.1722, and
186.174:
(a) "Special license plate" means a unique license plate issued under this chapter
to a group or organization that readily identifies the operator of the motor
vehicle or motorcycle bearing the plate as a member of a group or
organization, or a supporter of the work, goals, or mission of a group or
organization. The term shall not include regular license plates issued under
KRS 186.240;
(b) "Street rod" means a modernized private passenger motor vehicle
manufactured prior to the year 1949, or designed or manufactured to resemble
a vehicle manufactured prior to 1949;
(c) "SF" means the portion of an initial or renewal fee to obtain a special license
plate that is dedicated for use by the Transportation Cabinet;
(d) "CF" means the county clerk's fee for issuing a motor vehicle registration as
established under KRS 186.040(1). If a CF amount is charged for a license
plate listed in this section, the applicant for that plate shall also pay the fees
identified in KRS 186.040(6). If a CF amount is not charged, the applicant
shall not be required to pay those fees; and
(e) "EF" means the portion of an initial or renewal fee to obtain a special license
plate that is mandated by this chapter to be dedicated for use by a particular
group or organization.
(2) The initial purchase fee and renewal fee for a special license plate created under this
chapter shall be as established in this subsection and includes the name of group or
organization and the total initial and renewal fee required for the plate. The amount
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 1:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 145
in parentheses indicates how the total fee is required to be divided:
(a) Disabled veterans who receive assistance to purchase a vehicle from the
United States Department of Veterans' Affairs, veterans declared by the
United States Department of Veterans' Affairs to be one hundred percent
(100%) service-connected disabled, and recipients of the Congressional
Medal of Honor:
1. Initial Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/$0 EF).
(b) Former prisoners of war and survivors of Pearl Harbor:
1. Initial Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans'
program trust fund established under KRS 40.460).
2. Renewal Fee: $11 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans'
program trust fund established under KRS 40.460).
(c) Members of the Kentucky National Guard and recipients of the Purple Heart:
1. Initial Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans'
program trust fund established under KRS 40.460).
2. Renewal Fee: $11 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans'
program trust fund established under KRS 40.460).
(d) Members of the Civil Air Patrol; active, retired, veteran, reserve, or auxiliary
members of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space
Force, or Coast Guard; Merchant Marines who served between December 7,
1941, and August 15, 1945; recipients of the Silver Star Medal, the Legion of
Merit Medal, the Distinguished Flying Cross, the Air Medal, the Combat
Action Badge, the Combat Infantry Badge, or the Bronze Star Medal; persons
who wish to receive Gold Star Mothers, Gold Star Fathers, or Gold Star
Spouses license plates beyond the two (2) exempted from fees under KRS
186.041(6); individuals eligible for a special military service academy license
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 1:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 145
plate under KRS 186.041(8); individuals eligible for a special military unit
license plate under KRS 186.163; and disabled veterans who have been
declared to be between fifty percent (50%) and ninety-nine percent (99%)
service-connected disabled by the United States Department of Veterans'
Affairs:
1. Initial Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans'
program trust fund established under KRS 40.460).
2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans'
program trust fund established under KRS 40.460).
(e) Recipients of the Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, or Air Force
Cross:
1. Initial Fee: $6 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $6 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(f) Disabled license plates:
1. Initial Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(g) Historic vehicles:
1. Initial Fee for two plates: $56 ($50 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: Do not renew annually.
(h) Members of Congress:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans'
program trust fund established under KRS 40.460).
(i) Firefighters:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky
Firefighters Association).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 1:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 145
Firefighters Association).
(j) Emergency management:
1. Initial Fee: $31 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(k) Fraternal Order of Police:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky
FOP Death Benefit Fund).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky
FOP Death Benefit Fund).
(l) Law Enforcement Memorial:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky
Law Enforcement Memorial Foundation, Inc.).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky
Law Enforcement Memorial Foundation, Inc.).
(m) Personalized plates for a motor vehicle that is required to be registered under
the provisions of KRS 186.050(1), (3)(a), or (4)(a), or a motorcycle required
to be registered under the provisions of KRS 186.050(2):
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(n) Street rods:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(o) Nature plates:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky
Heritage Land Conservation Fund established under KRS 146.570).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky
Heritage Land Conservation Fund established under KRS 146.570).
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 1:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 145
(p) Amateur radio:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $18 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(q) Kentucky General Assembly:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans'
program trust fund established under KRS 40.460).
(r) Kentucky Court of Justice:
1. Initial Fee: $43 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $11 ($0 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the veterans'
program trust fund established under KRS 40.460).
(s) Masons:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Masonic
Homes of Kentucky).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Masonic
Homes of Kentucky).
(t) Collegiate plates:
1. Initial Fee: $53 ($37 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the general
scholarship fund of the university whose name will be borne on the
plate).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the general
scholarship fund of the university whose name will be borne on the
plate).
(u) Independent Colleges:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Association of
Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities for distribution to the
general scholarship funds of the Association's members).
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 1:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 145
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Association of
Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities for distribution to the
general scholarship funds of the Association's members).
(v) Child Victims:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the child victims'
trust fund established under KRS 41.400).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the child victims'
trust fund established under KRS 41.400).
(w) Kentucky Horse Council:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky
Horse Council).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky
Horse Council).
(x) Ducks Unlimited:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky Ducks
Unlimited).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to Kentucky Ducks
Unlimited).
(y) Spay neuter:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the animal control
and care fund established under KRS 258.119).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the animal control
and care fund established under KRS 258.119).
(z) Gold Star Mothers, Gold Star Fathers, or Gold Star Spouses:
1. Initial Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/ $0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $0 ($0 SF/$0 CF/ $0 EF).
3. A person may receive a maximum of two (2) plates under this paragraph
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 1:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 145
free of charge and may purchase additional plates for fees as established
in subsection (2)(d) of this section.
(aa) I Support Veterans:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky
Department of Veterans' Affairs).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Kentucky
Department of Veterans' Affairs).
(ab) Gold Star Siblings, Gold Star Sons, or Gold Star Daughters:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans'
program trust fund established under KRS 40.460).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans'
program trust fund established under KRS 40.460).
(ac) POW/MIA Awareness:
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans'
program trust fund established under KRS 40.460).
2. Renewal Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the veterans'
program trust fund established under KRS 40.460).
(ad) Personalized plates for a recreational vehicle that is required to be registered
under the provisions of KRS 186.050(11):
1. Initial Fee: $51 ($45 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $51 ($45 SF/$6 CF/$0 EF).
(ae) Child Care Assistance Partnership:
1. Initial Fee: $28 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF to the Employee
Child Care Assistance Partnership fund established in KRS 199.885).
2. Renewal Fee: $23 ($12 SF/$6 CF/$5 EF to the Employee
Child Care Assistance Partnership fund established in KRS 199.885).
(af) Special license plates established under KRS 186.164:
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 1:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 145
1. Initial Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF).
2. Renewal Fee: $41 ($25 SF/$6 CF/$10 EF).
(3) Any special license plate may be combined with a personalized license plate for a
twenty-five dollar ($25) state fee in addition to all other fees for the particular
special license plate established in this section and in KRS 186.164(3). The twenty-
five dollar ($25) fee required under this subsection shall be divided between the
cabinet and the county clerk of the county where the applicant is applying for the
license plate with the cabinet receiving twenty dollars ($20) and the county clerk
receiving five dollars ($5).
(4) (a) A sponsoring organization of any special license plate issued under this
section or any special license plate established under the provisions of KRS
186.164 may petition the cabinet for the production of that special license
plate for motorcycles.
(b) The cabinet shall make all of the special military license plates in this section
available for motorcycles owned or leased by eligible individuals.
(c) Owners and lessees of motorcycles registered under KRS 186.050(2) may be
eligible to receive special license plates approved by the cabinet under
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection. Applicants for a special license plate
for a motorcycle shall be required to pay the fee for a special plate as
prescribed in this section or in KRS 186.164. The fee paid for the special plate
for a motorcycle shall be in lieu of the registration fee required under KRS
186.050(2).
(5) The Transportation Cabinet shall:
(a) Identify the cost of issuing a child victims' trust fund special license plate
under subsection (2)(v) of this section; and
(b) Transfer any revenue received from the initial or renewal SF fee that is in
excess of the cost identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection to the child
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 1:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 145
victims' trust fund established under KRS 41.400.
Section 2. KRS 186.166 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Transportation Cabinet shall, unless directed otherwise by the General
Assembly, perpetually produce the following special license plates: military license
plates, military unit license plates, U.S. Congressional license plates, firefighter
license plates, emergency management license plates, Fraternal Order of Police
license plates, Law Enforcement Memorial license plates, street rod license plates,
nature license plates, amateur radio license plates, Kentucky General Assembly
license plates, Kentucky Court of Justice license plates, Masonic Order license
plates, collegiate license plates, independent college and university license plates,
child victims' trust fund license plates, Kentucky Horse Council license plates,
Ducks Unlimited license plates, Gold Star Mothers, Fathers, and Spouses license
plates, Gold Star Siblings, Sons, and Daughters license plates, Silver Star Medal
license plates, Legion of Merit Medal license plates, Bronze Star Medal license
plates, Air Medal license plates, Distinguished Flying Cross license plates, Combat
Action Badge license plates, Combat Infantry Badge license plates, POW/MIA
Awareness license plates, spay neuter license plates, service academy license plates,
Child Care Assistance Partnership license plates, and I Support Veterans license
plates.
(2) The design of the plates identified for perpetual production under this section may
be revised upon request of a group or organization requesting a design revision
under the provisions of KRS 186.164(15).
(3) (a) The design of a Purple Heart license plate shall not include any representation
of the word "Kentucky" that is a registered trademark or slogan which appears
on a general issue license plate.
(b) The design of a Purple Heart license plate shall include a representation of the
Purple Heart medal and the words "Combat Wounded."
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 1/3/2025 1:13 PM Jacketed